District of Columbia statutes.
4-218.02

Penalty for violation of § 4-218.01(b); prosecutions.

Any person violating § 4-218.01(b) shall be punished by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment of not more than 90 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Prosecutions for such violations and for violations of § 4-218.01(a) shall be brought to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or any of his or her assistants.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1802, 29 DCR 1060
This section is referenced in § 4-216.01.
1981 Ed., § 3-218.2.